Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 5 Gubernatorial Transition

Cross references.

Vacating of office upon permanent physical or mental disability of holder of office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. IV.

45-12-190.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “The Gubernatorial Transition Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 769, § 1.

45-12-191.
Legislative intent and purpose of article.

It is the purpose of this article to promote the orderly transfer of the executive power in connection with the expiration of the term of office of a Governor and the inauguration of a new Governor. The interest of the state requires that such transitions in the office of Governor be accomplished so as to assure continuity in the conduct of the affairs of the state government. Any disruption occasioned by the transfer of the executive power could produce results detrimental to the safety and well-being of the state and its people. Accordingly, it is the intent of the General Assembly that appropriate actions be authorized and taken to avoid or minimize any disruption. In addition to the specific provisions contained in this article directed toward that purpose, it is the intent of the General Assembly that all officers of the state government conduct the affairs of the state government for which they exercise responsibility and authority so as to:

Be mindful of problems occasioned by transitions in the office of Governor;

Take appropriate lawful steps to avoid or minimize disruptions that might be occasioned by the transfer of the executive power; and

Otherwise promote orderly transitions in the office of Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 769, § 2.

45-12-192.
“Governor-elect” defined.

As used in this article, the term “Governor-elect” means the apparent successful candidate for the office of Governor who is declared duly elected by the State Election Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 769, § 3.

45-12-193.
Services and facilities to be provided to Governor-elect; compensation of staff members; limitation on expenditure of funds; designation of assistant to make designation or findings of necessity.

The Governor-elect is authorized, in connection with his preparations for the assumption of official duties as Governor, to use necessary services and facilities, including:

Suitable office space appropriately equipped with furniture, furnishings, office machines, equipment, and office supplies, as determined by the Governor-elect or his designee provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section, at such place or places within the state as the Governor-elect shall designate;

Payment of the compensation of members of office staffs designated by the Governor-elect at rates determined by him. Any employee of any agency of any branch of the state government may be detailed to such staffs on a reimbursable or nonreimbursable basis with the consent of the head of the agency; and while so detailed such employee shall be responsible only to the Governor-elect for the performance of his duties. Any employee so detailed shall continue to receive the compensation provided pursuant to law for his regular employment and shall retain the rights and privileges of such employment without interruption. Notwithstanding any other law, persons receiving compensation as members of office staffs under this paragraph, other than those detailed from agencies, shall be nonclassified personnel;

Payment of expenses for the procurement of services of experts or consultants or organizations thereof for the Governor-elect, at rates not to exceed $100.00 per diem for individuals;

Payment of travel expenses and subsistence allowances as may be appropriate, including rental by the state government of hired motor vehicles found necessary by the Governor-elect, as authorized for persons employed intermittently or for persons serving without compensation;

Communications services found necessary by the Governor-elect; and

Payment of expenses for necessary printing and binding.

The Governor-elect shall expend no funds for the provision of services and facilities under this article in connection with any obligations incurred by him until he is declared duly elected by the State Election Board.

Each Governor-elect shall be entitled to conveyance of all mail matter sent by him in connection with his preparations for the assumption of official duties as Governor.

Each Governor-elect may designate an assistant authorized to make on his behalf such designations or findings of necessity as may be required in connection with the services and facilities to be provided under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 769, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-12-194.
Services and facilities to be provided to former Governor.

A succeeding Governor is authorized to provide, upon request, to each former Governor, for a period not to exceed three months from the date of the expiration of his term of office as Governor, for use in connection with winding up the affairs of his office, necessary services and facilities of the same general character as authorized by this article to be provided to a Governor-elect. Any person appointed or detailed to serve a former Governor under authority of this Code section shall be appointed or detailed in accordance with and shall be subject to Code Section 45-12-193.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 769, § 4.

45-12-195.
Appropriation of funds for gubernatorial transition.

Such funds as may be necessary for carrying out the purposes of this article may be appropriated to the Governor-elect in an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for any one gubernatorial transition. The Governor shall include in the budget transmitted to the General Assembly, for the fiscal year in which his regular term of office will expire, a proposed appropriation for carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 769, § 5.